Washington statutes.
RCW 36.34.240

Lease or conveyance to United States for flood control, navigation, and allied purposes—Cession of jurisdiction.

Pursuant to the Constitution and laws of the United States and the Constitution of this state, consent of the legislature is given to the exercise by the congress of the United States of exclusive legislation in all cases whatsoever on such tract or parcels of land so conveyed to it: PROVIDED, That all civil process issued from the courts of the state and such criminal process as may issue under the authority of the state against any person charged with crime in cases arising outside of said tract may be served and executed thereon in the same manner as if such property were retained by the county.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.34.240. Prior: 1937 c 46 s 3; RRS s 4015-8.]